Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 5. Legislative Space.

Sec. 24.05.190.
Control of legislative space.

The state capitol, with the exception of the capitol space now occupied by the Office of the Governor, and space occupied in any other state building by the legislature or its agencies is under the control of and subject to assignment by the Legislative Affairs Agency as directed by the legislature. The Legislative Affairs Agency is responsible for the equitable allocation of parking spaces at the capitol according to the needs of the legislature and other agencies occupying capitol offices.

Access to legislative space during sessions is generally governed by the uniform rules of the legislature and by (a) of this section. During a session of the legislature a person not a member or an authorized employee of the legislature or its agencies may not, without the invitation of the presiding officer or the house, enter upon the floor of either house while it is sitting, or enter upon the floor of either house during a recess or when adjourned for the day, without the invitation of a member of that house.

History.

(§ 21 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1976)

Sec. 24.05.200.
[Renumbered as AS 24.20.061.]

Sec. 24.05.210.
[Renumbered as AS 24.20.132.]